Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1841
Civil service; political service disregarded.

No person holding any position subject to civil service shall be under any obligation to contribute to any political fund or to render any political service to any person or party whatsoever. No person shall be removed, reduced in position or salary, or otherwise prejudiced for refusing so to do. No public officer, whether elected or appointed, shall discharge, promote, demote, or in any manner change the official rank, employment, or compensation of any person under civil service, or promise or threaten to do so, for giving, withholding, or neglecting to make any contribution of money, services, or any other valuable thing for any political purpose.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 16, p. 136;

R.S.1943, § 19-1816;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1816;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 20.